Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.470

Structural pest inspector—Failure to meet financial responsibility requirements.

Whenever the form of evidence of financial responsibility for a structural pest inspector license is reduced below the requirements of RCW 15.58.465 or no longer applies to the structural pest inspector, or whenever the licensee or the business that employs the licensee has failed to provide evidence of financial responsibility as required by RCW 15.58.460 by the expiration date of any previous form of evidence of financial responsibility, the director shall immediately suspend the structural pest inspector license until the requirements of RCW 15.58.465 are met again.

[ 2003 c 212 s 11; 2000 c 96 s 5.]